Wyoming, session 2026, HB0141.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 15-1-612 and 18-5-209 are created to
read:

15-1-612. Prohibitions on fees and conditions related
to housing on residential or commercial development.

HB0141

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0006
No governing body of a city or town shall impose a monetary
fee, nonmonetary condition or other concession related to
the provision of workforce housing, unmet housing needs or
affordable housing on residential or commercial development
within the jurisdiction of the governing body.

18-5-209. Prohibitions on fees and conditions related
to housing on residential or commercial development.

No board of county commissioners shall impose a monetary
fee, nonmonetary condition or other concession related to
the provision of workforce housing, unmet housing needs or
affordable housing on residential or commercial development
within the jurisdiction of the county.

Section 2.

(a) This act shall apply to all applications for
permits submitted for residential or commercial development
on or after July 1, 2026.

(b) Nothing in this act shall be construed to modify
or impair existing contracts or obligations regarding
HB0141

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0006
residential or commercial development and the imposition of
monetary fees, nonmonetary conditions or other concessions
executed before July 1, 2026.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0141